District of Columbia statutes.
25-752

Containers to be labeled.

No rectified or blended spirits shall be sold unless the container in which it is sold shall bear a legible label, firmly affixed, stating the nature and percentage of each ingredient (except water), the age of the ingredient, and the alcoholic content by volume.

History

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 336, ch. 4, § 36
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 25-752.
1973 Ed., § 25-134.